Utah statutes.
62A-4a-705.   Fulfillment of requirements.
Requirements for visitation, inspection, or supervision of children, homes,
institutions, or other agencies in another party state which may apply under
Part 2 of this chapter shall be deemed to be met if performed pursuant to an
agreement entered into by appropriate officers or agencies of this state, or a
subdivision thereof, as contemplated by Paragraph (2) of Article V of the
Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.
